






Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company (CL) | Daily Political











































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















Colgate-Palmolive Company - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Colgate-Palmolive Company with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Raymond James Financial, Inc. Trims United Community Banks, Inc. (UCBI) Target Price to $31.00					

Tractor Supply’s (NASDAQ:TSCO) Hold Rating Reaffirmed at Deutsche Bank AG					

TrovaGene, Inc. (TROV) Given a $4.00 Price Target by Maxim Group Analysts					

TCP Capital Corp. (NASDAQ:TCPC) Lowered to “Strong Sell” at BidaskClub					

Zacks Investment Research Downgrades Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc. (NYSE:HLT) to Hold					

Imperial Capital Begins Coverage on ShotSpotter Inc. (SSTI)					

WPCS International (WPCS) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Accern Reports					

Atlas Energy Group (ATLS) Receiving Favorable News Coverage, Report Shows					

Prana Biotechnology (NASDAQ:PRAN) Earning Somewhat Positive News Coverage, Analysis Shows					

Mitie Group PLC’s (MTO) “Buy” Rating Reaffirmed at Canaccord Genuity					

Jupiter Fund Management PLC (LON:JUP) Price Target Raised to GBX 500 at Credit Suisse Group					

Morgan Stanley Reiterates “GBX 1,700” Price Target for GlaxoSmithKline plc (GSK)					

Xcerra Corporation (NASDAQ:XCRA) Lowered to “Sell” at BidaskClub					

Veolia Environnement SA (NASDAQ:VEOEY) Upgraded to “Hold” by Zacks Investment Research					

Versartis, Inc. (VSAR) PT Set at $34.00 by Cantor Fitzgerald					

Continental Resources, Inc. (CLR) Given Average Recommendation of “Buy” by Analysts					

Jounce Therapeutics, Inc. (NASDAQ:JNCE) Given Consensus Recommendation of “Strong Buy” by Brokerages					

Zacks: Ageas SA (NASDAQ:AGESY) Given Consensus Rating of “” by Brokerages					

Leucadia National Corporation (NYSE:LUK) Issues Quarterly  Earnings Results					

Yamana Gold Inc. (AUY) Issues Quarterly  Earnings Results, Misses Expectations By $0.07 EPS					





 





						Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company (CL)					

						 July 14th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Trevor Kearing 


							Filed Under: Finance - SEC Filing Articles 







Tweet










Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV maintained its position in  Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL) during the first quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The firm owned 25,225 shares of the company’s stock at the end of the first quarter. Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV’s holdings in Colgate-Palmolive Company were worth $1,846,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Advantage Investment Management LLC purchased a new position in  Colgate-Palmolive Company during the fourth quarter worth about $104,000.  North Star Investment Management Corp. increased its position in  Colgate-Palmolive Company by 3.9% in the first quarter. North Star Investment Management Corp. now owns 1,797 shares of the company’s stock worth $132,000 after buying an additional 67 shares in the last quarter.  Security Asset Management purchased a new position in  Colgate-Palmolive Company during the fourth quarter worth about $131,000.  SRS Capital Advisors Inc. purchased a new position in  Colgate-Palmolive Company during the fourth quarter worth about $132,000.  Finally, Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC increased its position in  Colgate-Palmolive Company by 8.8% in the first quarter. Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC now owns 2,035 shares of the company’s stock worth $149,000 after buying an additional 165 shares in the last quarter. Institutional investors and hedge funds own  73.54% of the company’s stock. 
Shares of Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL) opened at 72.23 on Friday. The stock has a 50 day moving average price of $75.25 and a 200 day moving average price of $71.52. Colgate-Palmolive Company has a 12-month low of $63.43 and a 12-month high of $77.27. The firm has a market capitalization of $63.80 billion, a PE ratio of 26.07 and a beta of 0.80. 




Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL) last released its earnings results on Friday, April 28th. The company reported $0.67 earnings per share for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.66 by $0.01. The firm had revenue of $3.76 billion during the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $3.80 billion. Colgate-Palmolive Company had a return on equity of 3,725.55% and a net margin of 16.31%. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was up .0% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period in the prior year, the firm posted $0.63 earnings per share.  Analysts predict that  Colgate-Palmolive Company will post $2.93 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
The business also recently disclosed a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Tuesday, August 15th. Stockholders of record on Tuesday, July 18th will be given a dividend of $0.40 per share. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Friday, July 14th. This represents a $1.60 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 2.22%. Colgate-Palmolive Company’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently 57.76%. 
WARNING: “Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company (CL)” was originally  published by Daily Political and is the sole property of of Daily Political. If you are accessing this piece on another website, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of international trademark and copyright legislation. The original version of this piece can be viewed at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/14/walter-keenan-financial-consulting-co-mi-adv-holds-position-in-colgate-palmolive-company-cl.html. 
A number of research analysts recently issued reports on the company. Bank of America Corporation raised their price target on Colgate-Palmolive Company from $78.00 to $80.00 and gave the stock a “buy” rating in a research note on Wednesday, May 31st. BidaskClub downgraded Colgate-Palmolive Company from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research note on Saturday, June 24th. Vetr downgraded Colgate-Palmolive Company from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating and set a $76.67 price target on the stock. in a research note on Wednesday, May 17th. Royal Bank Of Canada  restated a “hold” rating and set a $74.00 price target on shares of Colgate-Palmolive Company in a research note on Thursday, May 25th. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC assumed coverage on Colgate-Palmolive Company in a research note on Tuesday, April 18th. They set a “hold” rating and a $78.00 price target on the stock. One analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, thirteen have assigned  a hold rating and three have assigned  a buy rating to the company. The stock currently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $75.55.
In other news, SVP John J. Huston sold 14,000 shares of the stock in a transaction on Wednesday, May 10th. The stock was sold at an average price of $71.53, for a total transaction of $1,001,420.00. Following the completion of the sale, the senior vice president now owns 102,838 shares in the company, valued at approximately $7,356,002.14. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through this hyperlink. Also, insider Patricia Verduin sold 3,833 shares of the stock in a transaction on Monday, April 17th. The shares were sold at an average price of $73.72, for a total value of $282,568.76. Following the sale, the insider now owns 53,022 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $3,908,781.84. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold a total of 43,666 shares of company stock valued at $3,184,972 in the last quarter. Insiders own  1.02% of the company’s stock. 
Colgate-Palmolive Company Company Profile
Colgate-Palmolive Company (Colgate) is a consumer products company. The Company operates in two product segments: Oral, Personal and Home Care, and Pet Nutrition. The Oral, Personal and Home Care product segment is operated through five geographic segments, which include North America, Latin America, Europe, Asia Pacific and Africa/Eurasia.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding CL? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL).






Receive News & Ratings for Colgate-Palmolive Company Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Colgate-Palmolive Company and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 
























































﻿




























Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Increases Position in Starbucks Corporation (NASDAQ:SBUX) - StockNewsTimes














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings & News for Starbucks Corporation
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Starbucks Corporation with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @StockNewTimes









Recent Posts

Apollo Investment Corporation’s (NASDAQ:AINV) “Buy” Rating Reiterated at Jefferies Group LLC
BMO Capital Markets () Given Average Recommendation of “” by Brokerages
Vivendi SA (VIV) – Analysts’ Recent Ratings Updates
Zacks Investment Research Lowers Iamgold Corporation (NYSE:IAG) to Hold
Zacks Investment Research Upgrades Universal Business Payment Solutions Acquisition Corp (NASDAQ:JTPY) to “Hold”
Hiscox Ltd (HSX) Scheduled to Post Earnings on Sunday
Repligen Corporation (NASDAQ:RGEN) Given Daily Media Impact Rating of 0.13
Atkore International Group (NASDAQ:ATKR) Earns Daily Media Impact Score of 0.47
KeyCorp Analysts Give The Ultimate Software Group, Inc. (ULTI) a $255.00 Price Target
Tesla Inc. (NASDAQ:TSLA) Given a $265.00 Price Target by Sanford C. Bernstein Analysts
TripAdvisor, Inc. (TRIP) Raised to Hold at Zacks Investment Research
Zacks Investment Research Upgrades Triton International Limited (TRTN) to “Buy”
Heritage Financial Corporation (NASDAQ:HFWA) Upgraded by Zacks Investment Research to “Buy”
Strayer Education Inc (STRA) Cut to “Buy” at BidaskClub
Merus Labs International Inc. (NASDAQ:MSLI) Expected to Post Earnings of $0.01 Per Share
Zacks Investment Research Downgrades NOW Inc. (DNOW) to Sell
PhotoMedex (PHMD) Earning Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Report Shows
Somewhat Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Monster Digital (NASDAQ:MSDI) Share Price
ABAXIS, Inc. (NASDAQ:ABAX) Rating Reiterated by Stifel Nicolaus
Pioneer Natural Resources Company (NYSE:PXD) Given Buy Rating at Stifel Nicolaus



 


Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Increases Position in Starbucks Corporation (NASDAQ:SBUX)

					Posted by Sally Masters on Jul 20th, 2017 // No Comments 



Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV boosted its stake in shares of  Starbucks Corporation (NASDAQ:SBUX) by 21.4% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 28,900 shares of the coffee company’s stock after buying an additional 5,100 shares during the period. Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV’s holdings in Starbucks Corporation were worth $1,687,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Other institutional investors have also recently modified their holdings of the company. Norges Bank purchased a new position in shares of  Starbucks Corporation during the fourth quarter valued at about $680,375,000.  Bank of New York Mellon Corp raised its position in shares of  Starbucks Corporation by 7.8% in the first quarter. Bank of New York Mellon Corp now owns 30,770,264 shares of the coffee company’s stock valued at $1,796,675,000 after buying an additional 2,234,324 shares in the last quarter.  Swiss National Bank raised its position in shares of  Starbucks Corporation by 24.0% in the first quarter. Swiss National Bank now owns 5,681,144 shares of the coffee company’s stock valued at $331,722,000 after buying an additional 1,099,100 shares in the last quarter.  Haverford Trust Co. purchased a new position in shares of  Starbucks Corporation during the first quarter valued at about $49,787,000.  Finally, William Blair Investment Management LLC raised its position in shares of  Starbucks Corporation by 46.2% in the fourth quarter. William Blair Investment Management LLC now owns 2,474,515 shares of the coffee company’s stock valued at $137,385,000 after buying an additional 781,747 shares in the last quarter. Hedge funds and other institutional investors own  69.55% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Starbucks Corporation alerts:



Shares of Starbucks Corporation (NASDAQ:SBUX) opened at 58.11 on Thursday. The company has a 50 day moving average of $60.10 and a 200-day moving average of $58.51. Starbucks Corporation has a 52-week low of $50.84 and a 52-week high of $64.87. The company has a market cap of $84.15 billion, a PE ratio of 28.74 and a beta of 0.82. 




Starbucks Corporation (NASDAQ:SBUX) last released its earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. The coffee company reported $0.45 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, meeting the consensus estimate of $0.45. The business had revenue of $5.29 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $5.42 billion. Starbucks Corporation had a net margin of 13.47% and a return on equity of 51.65%. Starbucks Corporation’s revenue for the quarter was up 7.3% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the previous year, the business earned $0.39 earnings per share.  Analysts forecast that  Starbucks Corporation will post $2.10 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This report was originally  published by StockNewsTimes and is the property of of StockNewsTimes. If you are accessing this report on another website, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of U.S. and international copyright and trademark law. The original version of this report can be accessed at https://stocknewstimes.com/2017/07/20/walter-keenan-financial-consulting-co-mi-adv-increases-position-in-starbucks-corporation-nasdaqsbux.html. 
Several equities analysts recently issued reports on SBUX shares. Jefferies Group LLC  restated a “buy” rating and set a $65.00 price target on shares of Starbucks Corporation in a research note on Friday, May 12th. Zacks Investment Research lowered Starbucks Corporation from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research note on Tuesday, March 28th. Deutsche Bank AG upgraded Starbucks Corporation from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and upped their price objective for the company from $59.00 to $69.00 in a research note on Monday, May 15th. Credit Suisse Group upped their price objective on Starbucks Corporation from $55.00 to $57.00 and gave the company a “neutral” rating in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Finally, Telsey Advisory Group started coverage on Starbucks Corporation in a research note on Monday, March 27th. They issued an “outperform” rating and a $66.00 price objective on the stock. One research analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, seven have assigned  a hold rating, twenty-five have assigned  a buy rating and three have issued  a strong buy rating to the company. The company presently has an average rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $65.64.
In other news, Director Myron E. Ullman III sold 10,000 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction dated Wednesday, June 14th. The shares were sold at an average price of $60.63, for a total transaction of $606,300.00. Following the transaction, the director now owns 24,000 shares in the company, valued at $1,455,120. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through the SEC website. Also, Director Myron E. Ullman III sold 20,000 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction dated Wednesday, May 3rd. The shares were sold at an average price of $60.43, for a total transaction of $1,208,600.00. Following the transaction, the director now owns 34,000 shares in the company, valued at approximately $2,054,620. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders have sold 144,826 shares of company stock worth $8,642,454 in the last quarter. Company insiders own  3.40% of the company’s stock. 
Starbucks Corporation Company Profile
Starbucks Corporation (Starbucks) is a roaster, marketer and retailer of coffee. As of October 2, 2016, the Company operated in 75 countries. The Company operates through four segments: Americas, which is inclusive of the United States, Canada, and Latin America; China/Asia Pacific (CAP); Europe, Middle East, and Africa (EMEA), and Channel Development.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding SBUX? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Starbucks Corporation (NASDAQ:SBUX).







Receive News & Ratings for Starbucks Corporation Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Starbucks Corporation and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 













































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









﻿






























Equifax, Inc. (EFX) Issues Q3 Earnings Guidance - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Equifax Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Equifax Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

iShares Nasdaq Biotechnology Index Fund (IBB) Shares Bought by Cumberland Advisors Inc.
Equifax, Inc. (EFX) Issues Q3 Earnings Guidance
Absolute Software (TSE:ABT) Declares Dividend Increase – $0.08 Per Share
OLD National Bancorp IN Acquires 3,222 Shares of First Interstate BancSystem, Inc. (FIBK)
FS Investment Corporation (FSIC) Receives $9.75 Average Price Target from Analysts
RioCan Real Estate Investment Trust (REI.UN) Receives C$29.60 Average PT from Brokerages
Sky Plc’s (SKY) “Hold” Rating Reaffirmed at Liberum Capital
SunTrust Banks Brokers Raise Earnings Estimates for Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (CMG)
Paloma Partners Management Co Invests $505,000 in Century Aluminum Company (NASDAQ:CENX)
73,300 Shares in Kohl’s Corporation (NYSE:KSS) Acquired by Country Club Trust Company n.a.
Paloma Partners Management Co Invests $518,000 in SodaStream International Ltd. (NASDAQ:SODA)
Owens-Illinois, Inc. (NYSE:OI) Shares Sold by AQR Capital Management LLC
AQR Capital Management LLC Sells 38,955 Shares of Spark Energy, Inc. (NASDAQ:SPKE)
AQR Capital Management LLC Sells 89,015 Shares of Armada Hoffler Properties, Inc. (NYSE:AHH)
Laredo Petroleum, Inc. (NYSE:LPI) Shares Bought by State Street Corp
Telenav, Inc. (TNAV) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Brokerages
Indivior PLC (INDV) Given Consensus Recommendation of “Buy” by Analysts
Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. (NYSE:VRX) PT Set at $23.00 by Cantor Fitzgerald
DAVENPORT & Co LLC Has $497,000 Position in KeyCorp (NYSE:KEY)
Boenning Scattergood Comments on Markel Corporation’s Q3 2017 Earnings (NYSE:MKL)







Equifax, Inc. (EFX) Issues Q3 Earnings Guidance


					Posted by Harper Lund on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments




Equifax, Inc. (NYSE:EFX) issued an update on its third quarter earnings guidance on Wednesday morning. The company provided EPS guidance of $1.50-1.54 for the period, compared to the Thomson Reuters consensus EPS estimate of $1.53. The company issued revenue guidance of $853-861 million, compared to the consensus revenue estimate of $857.19 million.Equifax also updated its FY17 guidance to $6.02-6.10 EPS.
Shares of Equifax, Inc. (NYSE:EFX) traded up 0.71% during trading on Friday, hitting $143.69. The stock had a trading volume of 108,576 shares. The firm has a market cap of $17.27 billion, a P/E ratio of 32.29 and a beta of 0.90. Equifax, Inc. has a 12-month low of $110.87 and a 12-month high of $147.02. The firm has a 50 day moving average price of $140.09 and a 200 day moving average price of $133.77. 


 Get Equifax Inc. alerts:



Equifax (NYSE:EFX) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Wednesday, July 26th. The credit services provider reported $1.60 earnings per share for the quarter, beating the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $1.57 by $0.03. The firm had revenue of $856.70 million for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $860.48 million. Equifax had a net margin of 16.62% and a return on equity of 25.20%. Equifax’s quarterly revenue was up 5.6% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period last year, the company posted $1.43 EPS.  On average, equities analysts expect that  Equifax, Inc. will post $6.07 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 





A number of research analysts recently weighed in on EFX shares. BidaskClub lowered shares of Equifax from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research note on Tuesday, June 27th. Royal Bank Of Canada  reaffirmed a buy rating and issued a $144.00 price target on shares of Equifax in a research note on Thursday, March 30th. Argus initiated coverage on shares of Equifax in a research note on Tuesday, June 13th. They issued a buy rating and a $166.00 target price on the stock. Stephens lowered shares of Equifax from an overweight rating to an equal weight rating in a research note on Friday, April 28th. Finally, Zacks Investment Research lowered shares of Equifax from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research note on Monday, July 17th. One analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, five have issued  a hold rating and nine have given a buy rating to the company’s stock. The company presently has a consensus rating of Buy and an average price target of $145.08.
In other news, CFO John W. Gamble, Jr. sold 14,000 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Tuesday, May 23rd. The shares were sold at an average price of $136.44, for a total transaction of $1,910,160.00. Following the completion of the sale, the chief financial officer now owns 48,578 shares in the company, valued at approximately $6,627,982.32. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through this link. 1.29% of the stock is owned by company insiders. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: This piece of content was originally  posted by Chaffey Breeze and is owned by of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this piece of content on another domain, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of U.S. and international trademark & copyright law. The legal version of this piece of content can be viewed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/28/equifax-inc-efx-issues-q3-earnings-guidance.html. 
Equifax Company Profile
Equifax Inc is a global provider of information solutions and human resources business process outsourcing services for businesses, governments and consumers. The Company operates in four segments: U.S. Information Solutions (USIS), International, Workforce Solutions and Global Consumer Solutions. Its products and services are based on databases of consumer and business information derived from various sources, including credit, financial assets, telecommunications and utility payments, employment, income, demographic and marketing data.







Receive News & Ratings for Equifax Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Equifax Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 














































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING CO - NILES, MI - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



MI



NILES



Investment Advice



Investment Advisory Service



                            WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING CO
                                    



 





















W 


WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING CO
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



423 SYCAMORE ST STE 101 NILES, MI 49120
Get Directions



(269) 684-3248





Business Info



 Founded 1982
 Incorporated MI
 Annual Revenue $180,000.00
 Employee Count --
 Industries Investment Advisory Service
 Contacts --







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co is located at 423 Sycamore St Ste 101 in Niles and has been in the business of Investment Advisory Service since 1982. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







W

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW) Stock Price, News & Analysis






















    























































































Illinois Tool Works Company Profile (NYSE:ITW)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)
Illinois Tool Works Inc. is a manufacturer of industrial products and equipment. The Company operates through seven segments. The Automotive OEM segment produces components and fasteners for automotive-related applications. The Food Equipment segment offers commercial food equipment. The Test & Measurement and Electronics segment produces test and measurement, and electronic manufacturing and maintenance, repair and operations (MRO) solutions. The Welding segment produces welding equipment, consumables and accessories for industrial and commercial applications. The Polymers & Fluids segment produces adhesives, sealants, lubrication and cutting fluids, and fluids and polymers for auto aftermarket maintenance and appearance. The Construction Products segment supplies engineered fastening systems and solutions. The Specialty Products segment produces beverage packaging equipment and consumables, product coding and marking equipment and consumables, and appliance components and fasteners. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Industrial Products
Industry: Industrial Conglomerates
Sub-Industry: Industrial Machinery
Symbol: NYSE:ITW
CUSIP: 45230810
Web: www.itw.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $48.65 billionOutstanding Shares: 345,451,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $145.34200 Day Moving Avg: $136.1552 Week Range: $111.50 - $150.29


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: 23.66Foreward P/E Ratio: 19.84P/E Growth: 2.61Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $13.8 billionPrice / Sales: 3.53Book Value: $13.01 per sharePrice / Book: 10.82Dividend:Annual Dividend: $2.60Dividend Yield: 1.8%


Profitability:EBIDTA: $3.62 billionNet Margins: 15.50%Return on Equity: 46.57%Return on Assets: 13.69%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: 1.54%Current Ratio: 2.32%Quick Ratio: 1.83%Misc:Average Volume: 1.19 million shs.Beta: 1.12Short Ratio: 5.24

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)
What is Illinois Tool Works' stock symbol?

Illinois Tool Works trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the ticker symbol "ITW."



How often does Illinois Tool Works pay dividends? What is the dividend yield for Illinois Tool Works?

Illinois Tool Works declared a quarterly dividend on Friday, May 5th. Investors of record on Friday, June 30th will be given a dividend of $0.65 per share on Wednesday, July 12th. This represents a $2.60 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 1.85%. The ex-dividend date is Wednesday, June 28th.  View Illinois Tool Works' Dividend History.



How were Illinois Tool Works' earnings last quarter?

Illinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW) announced its quarterly earnings results on Monday, July, 24th. The company reported $1.66 EPS for the quarter, beating the Zacks' consensus estimate of $1.63 by $0.03. The firm had revenue of $3.60 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $3.61 billion. Illinois Tool Works had a return on equity of 46.57% and a net margin of 15.50%. The company's revenue for the quarter was up 4.9% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter last year, the company earned $1.46 EPS.  View Illinois Tool Works' Earnings History.



When will Illinois Tool Works make its next earnings announcement?

Illinois Tool Works is scheduled to release their next quarterly earnings announcement on Wednesday, October, 18th 2017. View Earnings Estimates for Illinois Tool Works.



What guidance has Illinois Tool Works issued on next quarter's earnings?

Illinois Tool Works issued an update on its FY17 earnings guidance on Monday, July, 24th. The company provided earnings per share guidance of $6.32-6.52 for the period, compared to the Thomson Reuters consensus estimate of $6.38. Illinois Tool Works also updated its Q3 guidance to $1.57-1.67 EPS.



Where is Illinois Tool Works' stock going? Where will Illinois Tool Works' stock price be in 2017?

12 equities research analysts have issued 12-month target prices for Illinois Tool Works' stock. Their forecasts range from $136.00 to $170.00. On average, they expect Illinois Tool Works' stock price to reach $152.18 in the next twelve months. View Analyst Ratings for Illinois Tool Works.



What are analysts saying about Illinois Tool Works stock?

Here are some recent quotes from research analysts about Illinois Tool Works stock: 
1. According to Zacks Investment Research, "In the last three months, Illinois Tool's shares have outperformed the Zacks categorized Machinery-General Industrial market. Over the long run, the company’s organic and inorganic growth tactics, its long-term Enterprise Strategy and sound capital allocation schemes will prove beneficial. For 2017, it increased its earnings guidance to $6.20-$6.40 per share. Organic revenue growth is expected to be 2-4%, an improvement over the prior forecast of 1.5-3.5%. Total revenue is anticipated to come within $13.9-$14.1 billion range. Over the last 60 days, earnings estimates on the stock increased for 2018. " (7/12/2017)
2. Jefferies Group LLC analysts commented, "ITW hosted an Investor Day in New York this morning and provided initial guidance for 2017. Organic revenue growth of 1.5-3.5% and 100bps of EBIT expansion from Enterprise Initiatives are projected to yield EPS in the range of $6.00-$6.20 (Consensus at $6.14 on revenue growth of 3%). With a strong history of execution and low drama, we continue to view ITW as a core holding. Bottom Line: 2017 another year of stable growth. ITW’s preliminary forecast for organic revenue growth of 1.5-3.5% for 2017 compares to current consensus forecast of ~3% but assumes no improvement in end market trends. The guidance includes roughly 50bps of headwind from Product Line Simplification (PLS) actions, lower than the 100bps headwind since 2014-16. ITW’s targeted EPS range of $6.00-$6.20 compares to current consensus of $6.14. Of note: ITW’s 2017 EBIT margin target is 23.5%, 100bps above the 2016 target, and indeed management noted the target could be conservative." (12/5/2016)




Who are some of Illinois Tool Works' key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Illinois Tool Works include Caterpillar (CAT), ABB Ltd (ABB), Deere & Company (DE), Schneider Electric Unspon (SBGSY), Emerson Electric Company (EMR), Johnson Controls International PLC (JCI), Eaton Corporation, PLC (ETN), Komatsu (KMTUY), Roper Technologies (ROP), Ingersoll-Rand PLC (Ireland) (IR), Parker-Hannifin Corporation (PH), Stanley Black & Decker (SWK), Rockwell Automation (ROK), Sandvik AB (SDVKY), Tenaris S.A. (TS), Ball Corporation (BLL), TORAY INDS INC ADR(REP 10 (TRYIY) and Cintas Corporation (CTAS).



Who are Illinois Tool Works' key executives?

Illinois Tool Works' management team includes the folowing people: Ernest Scott Santi, Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive OfficerChristopher A. O'Herlihy, Vice ChairmanMichael M. Larsen, Senior Vice President, Chief Financial OfficerMary Katherine Lawler, Senior Vice President, Chief Human Resource OfficerJohn R. Hartnett, Executive Vice PresidentRoland M. Martel, Executive Vice PresidentSteven L. Martindale, Executive Vice PresidentSundaram Nagarajan, Executive Vice PresidentLei Zhang Schlitz, Executive Vice PresidentJuan Valls, Executive Vice President



Who owns Illinois Tool Works stock?

Illinois Tool Works' stock is owned by a number of of retail and institutional investors. Top institutional shareholders include Diamond Hill Capital Management Inc. (0.28%), Bank of Montreal Can (0.22%), APG Asset Management N.V. (0.20%), Rockefeller Financial Services Inc. (0.18%), BTIM Corp. (0.17%) and AMF Pensionsforsakring AB (0.15%). Company insiders that own Illinois Tool Works stock include Christopher A O'herlihy, David C Parry, Ernest Scott Santi, Jay L Henderson, John R Hartnett, Kevin M Warren, Lei Zhang Schlitz, Mary Katherine Lawler, Michael M Larsen, Michael R Zimmerman, Randall J Scheuneman, Roland M Martel and Sundaram Nagarajan. View Institutional Ownership Trends for Illinois Tool Works.



Who sold Illinois Tool Works stock? Who is selling Illinois Tool Works stock?

Illinois Tool Works' stock was sold by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Diamond Hill Capital Management Inc., APG Asset Management N.V., NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V., First Quadrant L P CA, ING Groep NV, Forsta AP Fonden, Rockefeller Financial Services Inc. and Great West Life Assurance Co. Can. Company insiders that have sold Illinois Tool Works stock in the last year include Christopher A O'herlihy, David C Parry, Ernest Scott Santi, John R Hartnett, Lei Zhang Schlitz, Michael M Larsen, Michael R Zimmerman and Sundaram Nagarajan. View Insider Buying and Selling for Illinois Tool Works.



Who bought Illinois Tool Works stock? Who is buying Illinois Tool Works stock?

Illinois Tool Works' stock was bought by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Harbour Capital Advisors LLC, Ardevora Asset Management LLP, Mn Services Vermogensbeheer B.V., Bank of Montreal Can, Pennsylvania Trust Co, Personal Capital Advisors Corp, Russell Investments Group Ltd. and Aperio Group LLC. Company insiders that have bought Illinois Tool Works stock in the last two years include Jay L Henderson and Mary Katherine Lawler. View Insider Buying and Selling for Illinois Tool Works.



How do I buy Illinois Tool Works stock? 

Shares of Illinois Tool Works can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Illinois Tool Works' stock price today?

One share of Illinois Tool Works stock can currently be purchased for approximately $140.83.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE ITW)Community Ranking:  2.4 out of 5 ( )Outperform Votes:  329 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  366 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  695MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Illinois Tool Works and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 6 Hold Ratings, 6 Buy RatingsConsensus Rating:Buy (Score: 2.50)Consensus Price Target: $152.18 (8.06% upside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails7/25/2017Credit Suisse GroupSet Price TargetHold$141.00Low7/25/2017Northcoast ResearchReiterated RatingNeutralLow7/25/2017Morgan StanleyReiterated RatingEqual Weight$140.00 -> $136.00Low7/25/2017Jefferies Group LLCReiterated RatingBuy$155.00 -> $170.00Low7/25/2017Royal Bank Of CanadaBoost Price TargetSector Perform -> Sector Perform$141.00 -> $143.00Low7/20/2017BMO Capital MarketsReiterated RatingBuy$160.00Low7/14/2017Stifel NicolausReiterated RatingHold$147.00Low6/1/2017Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)UpgradeSell -> Buy$131.00 -> $155.00Medium4/29/2017Deutsche Bank AGReiterated RatingBuy$140.00 -> $160.00Low4/26/2017ArgusBoost Price TargetBuy$145.00 -> $160.00Low4/25/2017Citigroup Inc.Boost Price TargetBuy$143.00 -> $161.00Low4/25/2017Barclays PLCBoost Price TargetEqual Weight$130.00 -> $141.00Low6/23/2016Robert W. BairdDowngradeOutperform -> Neutral$108.00N/A6/7/2016Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.Reiterated RatingBuyN/A4/21/2016Seaport Global SecuritiesReiterated RatingBuy$105.00 -> $125.00N/A3/2/2016J P Morgan Chase & CoBoost Price TargetNeutral$87.00 -> $93.00N/A(Data available from 7/29/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)Earnings History by Quarter for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE ITW)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails10/18/2017$1.65N/A7/24/2017Q2 2017$1.63$1.66$3.61 billion$3.60 billionViewN/A4/24/2017Q1 2017$1.45$1.54$3.40 billion$3.47 billionViewN/A1/25/2017Q416$1.37$1.39$3.41 billion$3.39 billionViewN/A10/20/2016Q316$1.49$1.50$3.50 billion$3.50 billionViewListen7/20/2016Q216$1.40$1.46$3.41 billion$3.43 billionViewListen4/20/2016Q116$1.26$1.29$3.25 billion$3.27 billionViewListen1/27/2016Q415$1.21$1.23$3.24 billion$3.30 billionViewListen10/21/2015Q315$1.36$1.39$3.45 billion$3.35 billionViewListen7/22/2015Q215$1.28$1.30$3.45 billion$3.43 billionViewListen4/21/2015Q115$1.17$1.21$3.48 billion$3.30 billionViewListen1/27/2015Q414$1.13$1.18$3.59 billion$3.50 billionViewListen10/21/2014Q314$1.23$1.28$3.68 billion$3.70 billionViewListen7/29/2014Q214$1.20$1.21$3.75 billion$3.72 billionViewListen4/22/2014Q114$0.98$1.01$3.57 billion$3.60 billionViewListen1/28/2014Q413$0.91$0.92$3.52 billion$3.55 billionViewListen10/22/2013Q313$0.94$0.99$3.59 billion$3.57 billionViewListen7/23/2013Q2 2013$1.10$1.03$4.29 billion$4.22 billionViewListen4/23/2013Q1 2013$0.96$0.96$4.28 billion$4.00 billionViewListen1/29/2013Q4 2012$0.89$0.89$4.15 billion$4.22 billionViewListen10/23/2012$1.06$1.09ViewN/A7/24/2012$1.10$1.11ViewN/A4/24/2012$0.95$0.97ViewN/A1/31/2012$0.88$0.90ViewN/A10/25/2011$0.98$1.00ViewN/A7/26/2011$1.02$0.99ViewN/A4/26/2011$0.84$0.91ViewN/A1/31/2011$0.80$0.79ViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: $6.262018 EPS Consensus Estimate: $7.01QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20173$1.42$1.45$1.44Q2 20173$1.60$1.63$1.62Q3 20173$1.63$1.66$1.65Q4 20173$1.55$1.57$1.56Q1 20182$1.68$1.69$1.69Q2 20182$1.80$1.83$1.82Q3 20182$1.80$1.81$1.81Q4 20182$1.69$1.72$1.71(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Current Dividend Information for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)Most Recent Dividend:7/12/2017Annual Dividend:$2.60Dividend Yield:1.85%Dividend Growth:24.90% (3 Year Average)Payout Ratio:42.07% (Trailing 12 Months of Earnings)  40.31% (Based on This Year's Estimates)36.62% (Based on Next Year's Estimates)Track Record:53 Years of Consecutive Dividend GrowthDividend History by Quarter for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE ITW)AnnouncedPeriodAmountYieldEx-Dividend DateRecord DatePayable Date5/5/2017quarterly$0.651.86%6/28/20176/30/20177/12/20172/10/2017quarterly$0.652.01%3/29/20173/31/20174/11/201710/28/2016quarterly$0.652.29%12/28/201612/30/20161/11/20178/5/2016quarterly$0.652.21%9/28/20169/30/201610/6/20165/6/2016quarterly$0.552.11%6/28/20166/30/20167/8/20162/12/2016quarterly$0.552.32%3/29/20163/31/20164/7/201610/30/2015quarterly$0.552.35%12/29/201512/31/20151/7/20168/7/2015quarterly$0.552.47%9/28/20159/30/201510/6/20155/8/2015quarterly$0.492.03%6/26/20156/30/20157/7/20152/13/2015quarterly$0.491.98%3/27/20153/31/20154/7/201510/31/2014quarterly$0.492.13%12/29/201412/31/20141/6/20158/8/2014quarterly$0.492.29%9/26/20149/30/201410/7/20145/2/2014quarterly$0.421.96%6/26/20146/30/20147/8/20142/14/2014quarterly$0.422.1%3/27/20143/31/20144/8/201411/1/2013quarterly$0.422.12%12/27/201312/31/20131/7/20148/2/2013quarterly$0.422.28%9/26/20139/30/201310/8/20135/3/2013quarterly$0.382.31%6/26/20136/28/20137/9/20132/15/2013quarterly$0.382.37%3/26/20133/28/20134/9/2013(Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)Insider Ownership Percentage: 0.90%Institutional Ownership Percentage: 75.51%Insider Trades by Quarter for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails6/9/2017John R HartnettInsiderSell11,750$144.96$1,703,280.00  6/5/2017Christopher A O'herlihyVice ChairmanSell36,467$144.00$5,251,248.00  5/26/2017Michael M LarsenCFOSell52,447$140.62$7,375,097.14  5/12/2017Ernest Scott SantiCEOSell101,297$138.03$13,982,024.91  4/26/2017John R HartnettInsiderSell13,889$139.27$1,934,321.03  4/24/2017Michael R ZimmermanInsiderSell5,000$140.00$700,000.00  3/1/2017Sundaram NagarajanInsiderSell4,554$133.28$606,957.12  2/13/2017Lei Zhang SchlitzInsiderSell33,629$129.49$4,354,619.21  12/14/2016Ernest Scott SantiCEOSell25$125.44$3,136.00  11/22/2016Michael R ZimmermanInsiderSell9,238$123.63$1,142,093.94  11/16/2016David C ParryVice ChairmanSell31,037$124.26$3,856,657.62  11/10/2016Sundaram NagarajanInsiderSell34,299$122.62$4,205,743.38  10/25/2016Jay L HendersonDirectorBuy4,000$111.94$447,760.00  9/7/2016Sundaram NagarajanInsiderSell4,560$119.50$544,920.00  8/11/2016David C ParryVice ChairmanSell40,000$118.49$4,739,600.00  7/22/2016Ernest Scott SantiCEOSell74,077$114.24$8,462,556.48  7/21/2016John R HartnettInsiderSell7,500$114.08$855,600.00  7/21/2016Michael M LarsenCFOSell14,000$113.99$1,595,860.00  7/21/2016Randall J ScheunemanVPSell15,641$114.21$1,786,358.61  7/12/2016Sundaram NagarajanEVPSell4,560$110.00$501,600.00  5/16/2016David C ParryVice ChairmanSell10,000$104.35$1,043,500.00  5/10/2016Christopher A O'herlihyVice ChairmanSell22,941$105.42$2,418,440.22  5/10/2016Lei Zhang SchlitzEVPSell2,500$104.63$261,575.00  5/6/2016Lei Zhang SchlitzEVPSell1,919$103.78$199,153.82  5/3/2016Roland M MartelEVPSell70,000$104.30$7,301,000.00  4/28/2016Lei Zhang SchlitzEVPSell2,500$105.17$262,925.00  4/25/2016David C ParryVice ChairmanSell8,000$104.41$835,280.00  2/8/2016Kevin M WarrenDirectorSell5,500$89.54$492,470.00  2/3/2016David C. ParryVice ChairmanSell70,000$89.30$6,251,000.00  9/1/2015Mary Katherine LawlerSVPBuy1,807$82.57$149,203.99  5/26/2015David C ParryVice ChairmanSell60,000$95.30$5,718,000.00  3/13/2015David C ParryVice ChairmanSell8,900$97.57$868,373.00  2/26/2015Steven L MartindaleEVPSell77,031$99.45$7,660,732.95  2/6/2015Maria C GreenVPSell13,000$97.50$1,267,500.00  2/3/2015Roland M MartelEVPSell60,000$95.00$5,700,000.00  1/28/2015Kevin M WarrenDirectorSell3,000$93.25$279,750.00  12/5/2014Christopher A O'herlihyEVPSell13,007$96.79$1,258,947.53  11/26/2014John R HartnettEVPSell3,507$95.36$334,427.52  10/30/2014Juan VallsEVPSell30,000$89.46$2,683,800.00  10/29/2014Sundaram NagarajanEVPSell11,012$90.03$991,410.36  8/21/2014Richard H LennyDirectorBuy1,000$89.17$89,170.00  7/30/2014David C ParryChairmanSell64,818$84.02$5,446,008.36  5/28/2014Robert C MccormackDirectorSell98,300$86.71$8,523,593.00  5/15/2014David ParryChairmanSell30,703$85.36$2,620,808.08  4/28/2014Robert MccormackDirectorSell28,700$84.55$2,426,585.00  4/23/2014Sharon BradySVPSell16,205$85.52$1,385,851.60  12/24/2013Sharon BradySVPSell30,000$83.02$2,490,600.00  12/9/2013Robert MccormackDirectorSell104,000$80.11$8,331,440.00  10/25/2013David C ParryChairmanSell20,000$78.04$1,560,800.00  10/23/2013Sharon M BradySVPSell60,000$78.01$4,680,600.00  9/11/2013Michael LarsenCFOBuy7,000$74.25$519,750.00  8/2/2013Ernest Scott SantiCEOSell46,250$75.00$3,468,750.00  7/29/2013Sundaram NagarajanEVPSell36,399$72.03$2,621,819.97  7/26/2013Sundaram NagarajanEVPSell2,254$72.00$162,288.00  7/25/2013Maria C GreenVPSell6,500$72.13$468,845.00  6/14/2013Ernest Scott SantiCEOSell46,250$70.42$3,256,925.00  6/5/2013David C ParryChairmanSell35,000$69.31$2,425,850.00  5/28/2013Sharon M BradySVPSell38,789$70.98$2,753,243.22  5/21/2013Timothy J GardnerEVPSell32,236$71.16$2,293,913.76  5/14/2013Craig A HindmanEVPSell80,000$69.36$5,548,800.00  12/3/2012Ernest Scott SantiCEOSell80,000$61.29$4,903,200.00  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)


Latest Headlines for Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineEarnings Review and Free Research Report: General Electric Q2 Results Outperformed Market Forecastsfinance.yahoo.com - July 29 at 12:05 AMIllinois Tool Works Inc. Forecasted to Post FY2018 Earnings of $7.10 Per Share (ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 27 at 2:08 PM3M (MMM) vs. Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW) Head-To-Head Analysiswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 27 at 9:40 AMIllinois Tool Works Inc. Forecasted to Earn Q3 2017 Earnings of $1.63 Per Share (NYSE:ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 27 at 8:52 AMQ4 2017 EPS Estimates for Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Boosted by Analystwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 26 at 1:01 PMJefferies Group Brokers Raise Earnings Estimates for Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 26 at 11:35 AMIllinois Tool Works Sees Margin Expansion and Earnings Growthwww.fool.com - July 26 at 10:14 AMSeaport Global Securities Equities Analysts Lower Earnings Estimates for Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 26 at 10:04 AMJefferies Group LLC Reaffirms "Buy" Rating for Illinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 25 at 11:29 PMIllinois Tool Works, Inc. breached its 50 day moving average in a Bearish Manner : ITW-US : July 25, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 25 at 8:49 PMMaker of Rain-X, other auto products opens new HQ in Houstonfinance.yahoo.com - July 25 at 8:49 PMMorgan Stanley Reaffirms "Equal Weight" Rating for Illinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 25 at 8:17 PMIllinois Tool Works (ITW) Beats Q2 Earnings, Lags Revenuesfinance.yahoo.com - July 25 at 5:44 AMIllinois Tool Works Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call Slidesseekingalpha.com - July 25 at 12:42 AMInvestor Network: Illinois Tool Works Inc. to Host Earnings Callfinance.yahoo.com - July 25 at 12:42 AMITW Reports Second-Quarter 2017 Resultsfinance.yahoo.com - July 25 at 12:42 AMIllinois Tool Works tops profit estimates, raises guidancefinance.yahoo.com - July 25 at 12:42 AMIllinois Tool Works tops 2Q profit forecastsfinance.yahoo.com - July 25 at 12:42 AMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Announces Quarterly  Earnings Results, Beats Estimates By $0.03 EPSwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 24 at 5:24 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Updates Q3 Earnings Guidancewww.americanbankingnews.com - July 24 at 10:28 AMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW) Issues FY17 Earnings Guidancewww.americanbankingnews.com - July 24 at 10:28 AMEarnings Scheduled For July 24, 2017 - Benzingawww.benzinga.com - July 24 at 5:28 AMCan Illinois Tool Works (ITW) Beat Earnings Estimates in Q2?finance.yahoo.com - July 22 at 2:37 AMMachinery Stocks' Q2 Earnings to Watch on Jul 24: ITW & SWKfinance.yahoo.com - July 22 at 2:37 AMNotable ETF Inflow Detected - VIG, FDX, SYK, ITW - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 21 at 12:09 AMCan Illinois Tool Works (ITW) Beat Earnings Estimates in Q2? - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 21 at 12:08 AMBMO Capital Markets Reiterates Buy Rating for Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 20 at 10:34 AMIllinois Tool Works: A Dividend King With Double-Digit Total Return Potentialseekingalpha.com - July 19 at 10:37 PMMiller Launches 2017 Bristol & Blue Sweepstakesfinance.yahoo.com - July 19 at 10:37 PM3 Reasons To Be Bullish On Illinois Tool Works (ITW) Ahead Of Earningsfinance.yahoo.com - July 19 at 10:37 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW) Expected to Post Quarterly Sales of $3.61 Billionwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 16 at 7:55 AMContrasting Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW) & General Electric Company (GE)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 15 at 6:20 PMIllinois Tool Works' (NYSE:ITW) "Hold" Rating Reaffirmed at Stifel Nicolauswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 15 at 11:50 AMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Expected to Post Earnings of $1.63 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - July 14 at 10:29 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Upgraded to "Buy" at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 12 at 8:26 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW) Receives Average Rating of "Buy" from Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 11 at 5:34 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW) Given "Equal Weight" Rating at Morgan Stanleywww.americanbankingnews.com - July 10 at 11:00 PMAnalyzing Carlisle Companies (CSL) & Illinois Tool Works (ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 8 at 7:43 AMIllinois Tool Works' (ITW) Prospects Bright: Time to Buy?finance.yahoo.com - June 28 at 7:34 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc.’s Prospects Are Bright: Is It Time to Buy ITW Stock?investorplace.com - June 28 at 3:07 PMNotable Tuesday Option Activity: C, BAX, ITW - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - June 27 at 11:14 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for June 28, 2017 - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - June 27 at 11:14 PMIYJ, CSX, ITW, EMR: Large Inflows Detected at ETF - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - June 27 at 12:55 AMITW Schedules Second Quarter 2017 Earnings Conference Call finance.yahoo.com - June 26 at 7:53 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Rating Lowered to Buy at BidaskClubwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 24 at 6:10 PM$3.61 Billion in Sales Expected for Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 22 at 10:06 AMHead-To-Head Survey: Honeywell International (HON) vs. Illinois Tool Works (ITW)www.americanbankingnews.com - June 22 at 7:50 AMHow These Industrial Goods Stocks are Performing? -- Flowserve, Illinois Tool ...www.prnewswire.com - June 21 at 3:44 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Expected to Announce Earnings of $1.63 Per Sharewww.americanbankingnews.com - June 20 at 6:42 PMIllinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) Receives Average Recommendation of "Buy" from Brokerageswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 16 at 12:50 PM


Social





Chart
Illinois Tool Works (ITW) Chart for Saturday, July, 29, 2017




This page was last updated on 7/29/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff














































Walter & Keenan Finanical Consulting Co | Wealthminder











































Walter & Keenan Finanical Consulting Co


Walter & Keenan Finanical Consulting Co
(CRD# 104838) is a financial advisory firm headquartered in
South Bend, IN.
They
manage $314,984,817 in 174 accounts and
serve the financial needs of clients across 2 states (or territories).




Current Firm Details



Walter & Keenan Finanical Consulting Co




202 S. Michigan St., Suite 910,
South Bend,
IN
46601
574-287-5977









By the Numbers






Total Assets Under Management

315
MILLION



Total Number of Accounts

174
ACCOUNTS



Average Account Value

$1,810,258







Compensation Options




A percentage of assets under your management
Hourly charges
Fixed fees (other than subscription fees)






Advisory Services Offered




Financial planning services
Portfolio management for individuals and/or small businesses
Portfolio management for businesses (other than small businesses) or institutional clients








Types of Clients










Registered States






Registered Investment Advisor


Advisors affiliated with a RIA are permitted to work with up to five clients in nearly-all states* without explicit registration. The map below shows states where this firm has explicit registration only.




IN, MI






Financial Advisors at Walter & Keenan Finanical Consulting Co




Showing 1 - 2 of 2 top financial advisors.





1















Charles M. Crabill



CRD#:
1612437



211 West Washington Ave, Suite 2400,
South Bend,
IN
46601




93

Wealthminder
score








Charles Crabill (CRD# 1612437) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Walter & Keenan Finanical Consulting Co in South Bend, IN and has 
over 20 years
of experience in the finance industry.






2















James F. Keenan



CRD#:
4362185



423 Sycamore Street Suite 101,
Niles,
MI
49120




87

Wealthminder
score








James Keenan (CRD# 4362185) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Walter & Keenan Finanical Consulting Co in Niles, MI and has 
1 year
of experience in the finance industry.













Our primary data source is public filings of Form ADV as published by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and made available in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA). Supplementary information may be provided by listed advisors or their representatives.
Because many firms provide a variety of products or services, an individual may or may not be registered to operate under all services provided by the firm.Do not rely solely on the information on this page. The information may be inaccurate, incomplete or outdated. For the most accurate and up-to-date information, please search for the firm or individual on the SEC site at
http://www.adviserinfo.sec.gov/IAPD/Content/Search/iapd_Search.aspx







Ready to hire a financial advisor?

Get competitive proposals from multiple advisors.

















Request Proposals























Timeout!



You have been idle and will be logged out in

seconds.


Stay Logged In
Log Out Now














﻿






























Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL) - Stock Observer













































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings & News for Colgate-Palmolive Company
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Colgate-Palmolive Company with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @StormInvestor







Recent Posts

Arrow Financial Corp Sells 110 Shares of AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
Morgan Stanley Increases Stake in Core Laboratories N.V. (CLB)
7,214 Shares in Allison Transmission Holdings Inc (NASDAQ:ALSN) Acquired by Gotham Asset Management LLC
Barnes Group, Inc. (NYSE:B) Position Raised by Geode Capital Management LLC
Pictet North America Advisors SA Has $864,000 Position in Praxair, Inc. (PX)
Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL)
Accenture PLC (NYSE:ACN) Stake Boosted by Bancorpsouth Inc.
TIAA CREF Investment Management LLC Maintains Position in Magna International, Inc. (MGA)
OppenheimerFunds Inc. Buys 9,979 Shares of SunOpta, Inc. (NASDAQ:STKL)
Zions Bancorporation (ZION) Shares Sold by Paloma Partners Management Co
Advance Auto Parts Inc (NYSE:AAP) Earns “Buy” Rating from Deutsche Bank AG
Creative Planning Buys 1,085 Shares of Agilent Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:A)
Creative Planning Has $790,000 Position in Xencor, Inc. (NASDAQ:XNCR)
Creative Planning Sells 4,060 Shares of 3D Systems Corporation (NYSE:DDD)
Q1 2018 EPS Estimates for Monotype Imaging Holdings Inc. Cut by Analyst (NASDAQ:TYPE)
Financial Contrast: Genesis Healthcare (GEN) versus Civitas Solutions (NYSE:CIVI)
Financial Contrast: GulfMark Offshore (GLF) versus SAExploration Holdings (SAEX)
Nexvet Biopharma PLC (NASDAQ:NVET) Receives Daily Coverage Optimism Rating of 0.12
MediWound (NASDAQ:MDWD) Getting Positive Media Coverage, Analysis Finds
Onconova Therapeutics (NASDAQ:ONTX) Receives Daily Coverage Optimism Score of 0.44



 


Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL)

					Posted by Brian Himes on Jul 24th, 2017 // No Comments 



Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV held its stake in shares of  Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL) during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the SEC. The institutional investor  owned 25,225 shares of the company’s stock at the end of the first quarter. Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV’s holdings in Colgate-Palmolive were worth $1,846,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Several other large investors also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. First Personal Financial Services boosted its position in  Colgate-Palmolive by 11.6% in the first quarter. First Personal Financial Services now owns 35,222 shares of the company’s stock valued at $2,578,000 after buying an additional 3,671 shares during the period.  Engineers Gate Manager LP bought a new position in  Colgate-Palmolive during the first quarter valued at $703,000.  Pax World Management LLC boosted its position in  Colgate-Palmolive by 7.1% in the first quarter. Pax World Management LLC now owns 6,032 shares of the company’s stock valued at $441,000 after buying an additional 400 shares during the period.  Wade G W & Inc. boosted its position in  Colgate-Palmolive by 70.2% in the first quarter. Wade G W & Inc. now owns 154,074 shares of the company’s stock valued at $11,277,000 after buying an additional 63,541 shares during the period.  Finally, Wedbush Securities Inc. boosted its position in  Colgate-Palmolive by 2.9% in the first quarter. Wedbush Securities Inc. now owns 19,631 shares of the company’s stock valued at $1,437,000 after buying an additional 562 shares during the period. Hedge funds and other institutional investors own  73.57% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Colgate-Palmolive Company alerts:



Shares of Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE CL) traded down 1.20% on Monday, reaching $72.39. The company’s stock had a trading volume of 509,812 shares. The stock has a market cap of $63.76 billion, a PE ratio of 26.90 and a beta of 0.81. Colgate-Palmolive Company has a 12-month low of $63.43 and a 12-month high of $77.27. The firm has a 50 day moving average price of $74.80 and a 200-day moving average price of $72.20. 




Colgate-Palmolive (NYSE:CL) last issued its earnings results on Friday, July 21st. The company reported $0.72 EPS for the quarter, hitting analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.72. Colgate-Palmolive had a return on equity of 3,121.95% and a net margin of 15.83%. The firm had revenue of $3.83 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $3.89 billion. During the same quarter in the prior year, the business earned $0.70 earnings per share. The company’s revenue was down .5% compared to the same quarter last year.  Equities research analysts expect that  Colgate-Palmolive Company will post $2.92 EPS for the current year. 
The business also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Tuesday, August 15th. Stockholders of record on Tuesday, July 18th will be paid a $0.40 dividend. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Friday, July 14th. This represents a $1.60 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 2.18%. Colgate-Palmolive’s payout ratio is 59.48%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: “Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company (NYSE:CL)” was  reported by Stock Observer and is the sole property of of Stock Observer. If you are viewing this piece of content on another website, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of U.S. and international copyright & trademark law. The correct version of this piece of content can be accessed at https://www.thestockobserver.com/2017/07/24/walter-keenan-financial-consulting-co-mi-adv-holds-position-in-colgate-palmolive-company-nysecl-updated.html. 
Several research analysts recently weighed in on the stock. Bank of America Corporation upped their price objective on shares of Colgate-Palmolive from $78.00 to $80.00 and gave the stock a “buy” rating in a research report on Wednesday, May 31st. BidaskClub lowered Colgate-Palmolive from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research note on Saturday, June 24th. Vetr lowered Colgate-Palmolive from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating and set a $76.67 target price for the company. in a research note on Wednesday, May 17th. Royal Bank Of Canada  reaffirmed a “hold” rating and issued a $74.00 target price on shares of Colgate-Palmolive in a research note on Thursday, May 25th. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC began coverage on Colgate-Palmolive in a research note on Tuesday, April 18th. They set a “hold” rating and a $78.00 price objective for the company. One investment analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, thirteen have assigned  a hold rating and three have assigned  a buy rating to the company. The stock presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $75.69.
In other Colgate-Palmolive news, insider Patricia Verduin sold 3,833 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Monday, July 17th. The stock was sold at an average price of $72.41, for a total transaction of $277,547.53. Following the transaction, the insider now owns 53,022 shares in the company, valued at $3,839,323.02. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is accessible through the SEC website. Also, Director Richard J. Kogan sold 8,000 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Monday, May 8th. The stock was sold at an average price of $71.92, for a total value of $575,360.00. Following the transaction, the director now owns 73,065 shares in the company, valued at approximately $5,254,834.80. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders sold 29,666 shares of company stock worth $2,144,371 in the last 90 days. Company insiders own  1.02% of the company’s stock. 
Colgate-Palmolive Company Profile
Colgate-Palmolive Company (Colgate) is a consumer products company. The Company operates in two product segments: Oral, Personal and Home Care, and Pet Nutrition. The Oral, Personal and Home Care product segment is operated through five geographic segments, which include North America, Latin America, Europe, Asia Pacific and Africa/Eurasia.







Receive News & Ratings for Colgate-Palmolive Company Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Colgate-Palmolive Company and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




Arrow Financial Corp Sells 110 Shares of AbbVie Inc. 





Zions Bancorporation  Shares Sold by Paloma Partners Management Co





OppenheimerFunds Inc. Buys 9,979 Shares of SunOpta, Inc. 





TIAA CREF Investment Management LLC Maintains Position in Magna International, Inc. 





Accenture PLC  Stake Boosted by Bancorpsouth Inc.





Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Co. MI ADV Holds Position in Colgate-Palmolive Company 






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 









































Hosse Financial Services























skip navigation






Hosse Financial Services



Contact Us

 Hosse Financial Services 

600 Crain Highway South
Glen Burnie, MD 21061     

Phone: 410-768-0022
Fax: 410-768-7958
aghosse @hossefinancial.com

Map and Directions










Home


About Us


Our Mission Statement


Our Associates


Our Location


Our Firm


Our Services


Our Qualifications


Featured Links


Tell A Friend




Resources


Articles


Calculators


Flipbooks


Newsletters


Glossary


Tax Library


Videos




Market Watch

Detailed Quote
Symbol Lookup
Multi Quote
Markets at a Glance
Charting
Portfolio



Request A Quote


Annuity 


Long-Term Care Insurance  


Group Health 


Life Insurance  


Individual Health 


Disability Income Insurance


401(k) Information Request


Information Request




Contact Us






























































share

|





 








Welcome to our Web site, where you’ll find a wealth of information in the form of newsletter articles, calculators, and research reports. We hope your visit will help you understand the opportunities and potential rewards that are available when you take a proactive approach to your personal financial situation. We have created this Web site to help you gain a better understanding of the financial concepts behind insurance, investing, retirement, estate planning, and wealth preservation. Most important, we hope you see the value of working with skilled professionals to pursue your financial goals.We’re here to help educate you about the basic concepts of financial management; to help you learn more about who we are; and to give you fast, easy access to market performance data. We hope you take advantage of this resource and visit us often. Be sure to add our site to your list of "favorites" in your Internet browser. We frequently update our information, and we wouldn’t want you to miss any developments in the area of personal finance.




Newsletters




HOT TOPIC: Automating the American Workforce

What current trends in workforce automation could mean for U.S. workers, industries, and the broader economy.



Who Needs a Succession Plan? Maybe You

Monetizing a closely held business is often a long and difficult process, so business owners may benefit by developing an exit strategy. 



New Law Requires Notification of Medicare Observation Status

The distinction between observation care and inpatient status while in the hospital can make a difference in a patient’s out-of-pocket costs.



Could the AMT Boost Your Taxes?

An explanation of how the alternative minimum tax works. It is expected to affect about 4.3 million taxpayers in 2016.



More Newsletters »




Calculators




Savings Goals

How much do you need to save each year to meet your long-term financial goals?



Cash Flow Analysis

This Cash Flow Analysis form will help you weigh your income vs. your expenses.



Roth IRA Conversion

This calculator can help you determine whether you should consider converting to a Roth IRA.



Federal Income Tax

This calculator can help you estimate your annual federal income tax liability.



More Calculators »













				About Us 
			


Our Mission Statement


Our Associates


Our Location


Our Firm


Our Services


Our Qualifications


Featured Links


Tell A Friend





Learning Center



Articles
Educate yourself on a variety of financial topics.


Calculators
A host of financial tools to assist you.


Newsletters
Timely Newsletters to help you stay current.


Videos

                  
                    A dynamic library of videos.
                  
                


Flipbooks

                  These magazine-style flipbooks provide helpful information. 
                



Glossary

Financial terms from A to Z.



Tax Library

Manage your taxes and prepare for the upcoming tax season.





Market Watch


Last Closing Prices 


Ticker Name
Percent Difference (when noted with %) otherwise Last Price
Difference (where applicable)





Nasdaq Composite

6,374.68
-0.12



NYSE Composite

11,954.69
-0.07

 


Enter stock ticker symbol:

Get Quote




[
Markets 
  	| 
  	Charts 
  	| 
  	Quotes 
  	| 
  	Portfolio
]


    Market data delayed per exchange rules.
    All quotes are in US Eastern Time (EST).
    © Interactive Data Managed Solutions (NYSE:IDC) All rights reserved.
  



Contact Us

 Hosse Financial Services 

600 Crain Highway South
Glen Burnie, MD 21061     

Phone: 410-768-0022
Fax: 410-768-7958
aghosse @hossefinancial.com

Map and Directions







Andrew G. Hosse is registered with and securities are offered through Kovack Securities, Inc. Member FINRA/SIPC Kovack Securities Corporate Headquarters: 800-711-4078 www.kovacksecurities.com. Investment Advisory services are offered through Kovack Advisors, Inc. Hosse Financial Services, Inc. is not affiliated with Kovack Securites, Inc. or Kovack Advisors, Inc.
Andrew G. Hosse is registered in AK, AR, DE, MD and PA
 
 
 
 
Neither Kovack Securities, Inc. (KSI) nor its representatives provide legal, tax or accounting advice. Persons who provide such advice do so in a capacity other than as a Registered Representative with KSI.




Site Map






 











 




	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started








































WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING COMPANY Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING COMPANY
                    

•   SOUH BEND, IN
                          • Investment Advisor
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Company is based out of Souh Bend. Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Company is a large advisory firm with  26-100 clients and discretionary assets under management (AUM) of $339,340,932 (Form ADV from 2017-03-13).  Their last reported 13F filing for Q1 2017 included $192,829,000 in managed 13F securities
    and a top 10 holdings concentration of 31.52%. Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Company's largest holding is Exxon Mobil Corp. with shares held of 120,695.  Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Company has met the qualifications for inclusion in our WhaleScore system.    WhaleWisdom has at least 14 13F filings in our database for Walter & Keenan Financial Consulting Company. 
                                           






Equal-WTWhaleScore
?


66
S&P 500WhaleScore
?



Manager WeightedWhaleScore
?















Summary
13F Holdings
Ind. Managers
Inv. Advisor Info
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)
 WhaleScore History



                Download 13F Summary to Excel
              


                    Download 13F Summary to Excel
                  


   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING COMPANY, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel















03/31/2017
Top Buys




Name% Change


CCI
        
        Crown Castle Intern...
0.6%



AAPL
        
        Apple Inc
0.532%



AMGN
        
        Amgen, Inc.
0.313%



DIS
        
        Walt Disney Co. (The)
0.271%



MMM
        
        3M Company
0.258%








03/31/2017
Top Sells





Name% Change


XOM
         
         Exxon Mobil Corp.
1.136%


SCHB
         
         Schwab US Broad Mar...
0.87%


GE
         
         General Electric Co
0.478%


EEP
         
         Enbridge Energy Par...
0.387%


JPM
         
         JPMorgan Chase & Co.
0.322%







03/31/2017
13F Holdings Summary




Stock% Port


XOM
                                                  
                                                  Exxon Mobil Corp.
5.133%


GE
                                                  
                                                  General Electric Co
3.6296%


JNJ
                                                  
                                                  Johnson & Johnson Co.
3.5539%


MSFT
                                                  
                                                  Microsoft Corp.
3.4689%


JPM
                                                  
                                                  JPMorgan Chase & Co.
3.0519%

See All Holdings






03/31/2017
13F Activity




Market Value
                        $192.829 Million

                        Prior Market Value
                        $188.037 Million
New Purchases7 stocks
Additional Purchases35 stocks
Sold out of6 stocks
Reduced holdings in39 stocks
Top 10 Holdings %31.52%
Turnover %
                        [1]:9.09%
Turnover Alt %
                    [2]:6.06%
Time Held Top20:8.70 quarters
Time Held Top10:9.10 quarters
Time Held All:9.04 quarters

[1]:
                  Turnover is calculated by taking the # of new holdings (initial purchases) + the # of positions sold out of (not just reduced) divided by the total # of holdings for the quarter.
                
[2]:
                  Alt Turnover is calculated by taking either the total MV of new purchases or
                   the MV of securities sold, whichever is less,
                   divided by the total MV of the fund.
                






03/31/2017
13F Sector Allocation Over Time











Fund Metrics

You are limited to the prior 8 quarters of 13F filings.
            Subscribe to WhaleWisdom to view all filing data
            for WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING COMPANY






Portfolio Performance
                    Top 20 equal-weighted holdings. Last updated
                      on 2017-06-29 



Performance
                      for Q1 2017:
                    
-0.64%


Performance Last 4 Quarters:
14.81%





Performance Metrics




Stdev (5-yrs):
Subscription required
BETA (5-yrs):
Subscription required
ALPHA (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Max Drawdown (all-years):
Subscription required
Annualized Perf (3-yrs):

                          Subscription required
                        
Batting Avg vs S&P. (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Sortino (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Stutzer (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Treynor (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Sterling (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Calmar (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Information Ratio (3-yrs):
Subscription required


Tracking Error (3 yrs):

                          Subscription required
                        
Stdev Down (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Winning Months %:
Subscription required


Losing Months %:
Subscription required
Best 12 Months:
Subscription required
Worst 12 Months:

                          Subscription required
                        


Efficiency Ratio (3-yrs):

                          Subscription required
                        
Sharpe:
Subscription required
Stdev Sectors:
Subscription required


Skewness (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Kurtosis (3-yrs):
Subscription required
Upside Potential (3-yrs):
Subscription required





















Backtester

Use WhaleWisdom's Backtester tool to test how a hypothetical portfolio would have performed with different
        investment strategies. Research one or more filers' performance and then optimize their portfolios to match your
        own investment goals.
Start with one of our predefined groups or create your own.
        View the
        Backtesting Whitepaper
        and the Getting Started page for
        additional help.
      



Take a Tour

           Save Changes to Tracked Backtest
Saving......

GENERATE
      REPORT
At least
      one fund must be selected before running a backtest
    
{{InvalidConfiguration()}}


    {{ErrorMessage}}
  

    "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
    and
    "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
    are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
  


Backtester

Use WhaleWisdom's Backtester tool to test how a hypothetical portfolio would have performed with different
        investment strategies. Research one or more filers' performance and then optimize their portfolios to match your
        own investment goals.
View the
        Backtesting Whitepaper
        and the Getting Started page for
        additional help.



GENERATE
      REPORT


    {{ErrorMessage}}
  

    "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
    and
    "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
    are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
  




Filers Selected: {{groupinfo.group.description}} - {{groupinfo.group.filers.length}}
      (click to edit)


      {{criteria.whalescore.description}}
      (click to edit)


      Filers being chosen based on prior performance
    
Get started by using: 

WhaleWisdom Fund Groups
WhaleScore Filers

One of your custom groups
Choose Filers by Performance
Log in to use your saved groups
Create new custom group



WhaleWisdom Fund Groups


{{g.filers.length}}

{{g.description}}





Use Heat Map Stocks







{{g.filers.length}}

{{g.description}}






< Back

Select WhaleScore Filers:
WhaleScore filers are chosen based on scores calculated the previous quarter.


Pro Sub. Required

{{o.description}}






< Back

Select Filers by Prior Performance
Filers are selected each quarter based on their prior performance. You can restrict which
      filers are included by using the filters below.



          Pro subscription required to select filers by performance
        


How do you want funds chosen?




Maximum Filers to use each quarter

            

(your subscription allows up to {{Limit}} filers):
Maximum number of filers
              to use exceeed
Maximum filers must set to
              at least 1




Quarterly turnover %






% top 10 concentration






 # of Holdings in 13F
              Portfolio
from:
            
            to
            
{{criteria.filer_performance.holdings_from_to[0]}} - {{criteria.filer_performance.holdings_from_to[1]}}


 Market Cap of Fund's 13F
              Portfolio
from:
            
            to
            

                                                      {{format_number(criteria.filer_performance.mc_from_to[0])}} - {{format_number(criteria.filer_performance.mc_from_to[1])}}
                                                    


 Avg. Time Held Top 10 (quarterly)
from:
            
            to
            

                                                                {{criteria.filer_performance.time_held_top10_from_to[0]}} quarters - {{criteria.filer_performance.time_held_top10_from_to[1]}} quarters
                                                              





Matching filers from latest quarter:
{{FilerPerformanceMatches}}






< Back
{{groupinfo.group.filers.length}}




Backtest options
Optional Stock Filters
Optional Hedging/Advanced



< Back


How do you want stocks selected when rebalancing?  


{{s.description}}
          


5
10
20
30
40
50


 (Pro sub. required)



        "Top # Holding(s) by Dollar Value from each fund's holdings"
        and
        "Top # Holding(s) by Percent Ownership from each fund's holdings"
        are not available when using WhaleScore Filers.
      


(optional) Minimum # of funds holding stock

(optional) Minimum percent of portfolio for each fund


Custom Weight Per Fund (scale of 1 through 10)


{{filer.name}}





Reset Weight



Specify the number of holdings to use



          {{s.description}}
        

          ** Holdings greater than 20 require a Pro level subscription to use. **
        




How do you want available funds allocated among stocks?  








< Back



Restrict Stocks Selected by Stock Market Cap Size?


 {{cap.name}}
                              




Stock Exclusions
Do not include stocks whose price exceeds:

Do not include stocks whose price is less:

Do not include any of the following tickers:
                                                          (comma separated)






ETF Filter
 ETF Holdings Only

 Exclude ETFs


ADR Filter *Pro Only*
 Foreign ADR Only

 Exclude ADRs





Limit Stock Selection to Certain Sectors or Industries? Restrict stocks to those in the selected sector or industry







< Back




Hedging Strategies

Simple Short Exposure. This strategy effectively shorts the S&P 500 by
        buying shares in the S&P 500 Short ETF.
        Simple Hedging will assume that 100%
        of the backtest's invested principal is always in the backtest's long positions.

        For example, if you choose a 25% hedging rate, then for a $10,000 portfolio,
        you will be long $10,000 and have a $2,500 short on the S&P 500.
        The short position will adjust each rebalancing period to match 25% of the total portfolio.
        Any gains/losses from the short are added to the overall available capital for the long positions in the
        portfolio.
      

Moving Average Hedge.  With this strategy, your portfolio will be hedged
        by shorting the S&P 500 whenever your long portfolio's performance drops below the monthly moving average.
        So if you set a 25% hedge, 25% of your long portfolio will be sold and the funds reallocated to the short
        whenever the hedge is in effect.
        Once your long portfolio performance goes back over the moving average, the short hedge will be removed
        and the funds from the short will be reallocated to your long positions.
      

        When hedging strategies are being used, backtests can only go back as far as 2006.  This is the date
        the S&P 500 Short ETF first appeared.
      

        Pro subscription required to use hedging strategies
      
Hedging Strategy:

      

No Hedging

          Short-Exposure Hedge
        

          Moving Average Hedge
        

Moving Average Months:


Moving Average Target:
                   

Your backtested portfolio
S&P 500 TR Index
Russell 2K TR Index

the moving average that will determine when hedging is on or off

Hedging %:
      

25%
50%
75%
100%



Stock Sell Buffer

      You can optionally include a stock sell buffer in your backtesting model.
      It works by keeping a stock in your portfolio even when it would otherwise drop out
      during rebalancing as long as it remains within your sell buffer threshold.
      For example, you are backtesting with the top 20 stocks each quarter and set a sell buffer of 50.
      In the first quarter, AAPL is one of the top 20 stocks and is included in the portfolio.
      In quarter 2, AAPL drops down to number 25. Without the sell buffer, AAPL would drop out
      for that quarter, but since it is still within the sell buffer threshold of 50,
      it will remain in the portfolio.
      Your portfolio size remains the same. The stocks that would have fallen out stay in and the
      stocks that would otherwise have been added stay out. Using the sell buffer may
      help produce a lower turnover rate.
    

      Sell Buffer Size (must be greater than # of holdings in portfolio to work):
      
No sell buffer
10
25
35
50
100




Rebalancing Frequency

      By default backtester rebalances quarterly using new 13F filing data. You can
      adjust the rebalancing frequency using the dropdown below. Reasons for
      changing the frequency include lower turnover and possible tax advantages
      by keeping stocks at least one year before selling.
    


        Do not rebalance after each quarter

or rebalance:
        
Every quarter (default)
 Every other quarter
 Once a year




How many days after the end-of-quarter date before doing the backtest? (0 - 60) 

DAYS





      Or use day whenever the filing was submitted to the SEC
      (or the last filing when using a group of funds):
Starting Quarter

      By default backtester will test your strategy using all available dates going back to 2001 (for subscribers only).
      You can optionally adjust when the backtest actually starts.
    
Starting Quarter:
      
All Available Dates


  Ending Quarter:
      
All Available Dates






GENERATE
      REPORT





Backtest Results:



Download Backtest Data to Excel
Downloading.  Please wait.....


Start Tracking This Backtest
Saving......


                                    Stop tracking this backtest
                                  
Log in to start tracking this backtest



No report has been run






                                {{s.description}}
                              

Configure Moving Averages


As of 2017-07-28








Want to backtest using all available 13F history?
      As a non-subscriber you are limited to the past two years of filing data.
        Subscribe now and backtest using 13F holdings data as
        far back as 2001.
      








 
YTD
1Y
2Y
3Y
5Y
7Y
10Y
Total Return
Annualized
Std Dev
Sortino



Whale(s)
Unhedged Portfolio

{{starting_record.yearly_entries[starting_record.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(starting_record,10)| number:2}}%
{{starting_record.performance*100|number}}%
{{starting_record.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{starting_record.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{starting_record.sortino|number}}


Hedged Portfolio
{{hedged_matrix.yearly_entries[hedged_matrix.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(hedged_matrix,10)| number:2}}%
{{hedged_matrix.performance*100|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{hedged_matrix.sortino|number}}


{{chart.comparison_index.description}}
{{chart.comparison_index.yearly_entries[chart.comparison_index.yearly_entries.length-1][3]*100|number}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,1)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,2)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,3)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,5)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,7)| number:2}}%
{{GetYearlyPerformance(chart.comparison_index,10)| number:2}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.performance*100|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.annualized_performance*100|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.standard_deviation*100.0|number}}%
{{chart.comparison_index.sortino|number}}









                          Current Holdings Rebalanced on {{results.ending_period.start_date}}
                          Click the "Download Backtest Data to Excel" link above to see all stock activity


                          Stock prices used are the "total returns" stock price and will include
                          dividends, spinoffs, splits, and other adjustments.  Because of this, stock
                          prices shown here will likely not
                          match a stock's actual closing stock price on the same date.
                        





Stock Name
% of Portfolio
Avg Price Per Share(total returns price)
Total Returnas of 2017-07-28
Original Purchase Date



            								                  {{transaction.ticker}}
            								               {{transaction.stock_name}}

Sold All
{{transaction.percent_of_portfolio*100.0|number:2}}

{{transaction.avg_price|currency}}


                                ${{starting_record.hedging_gain|number:2}}
                              

                                {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(transaction)|number:2}}%
                                                            

{{transaction.original_purchase_date}}


{{results.ending_period.hedge.stock_name}}

{{transaction.avg_price|currency}}

                              {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(results.ending_period.hedge)|number:2}}%
                            

                              {{results.ending_period.hedge.original_purchase_date}}
                            


*** Currently using {{ending_hedged_transaction.stock_name}} ***

{{ending_hedged_transaction.avg_price|currency}}

                                                        {{GetTransactionTotalReturn(ending_hedged_transaction)|number:2}}%
                                                      

                                                        {{ending_hedged_transaction.original_purchase_date}}
                                                      









Ending Sector Allocation

















































Quarter to view:

Current Combined 13F/13D/G
Q1 2017 13F Filings 
Q4 2016 13F Filings 
Q3 2016 13F Filings 
Q2 2016 13F Filings 
Q1 2016 13F Filings 
Q4 2015 13F Filings 
Q3 2015 13F Filings 
Q2 2015 13F Filings 
Q1 2015 13F Filings subscription required
Q4 2014 13F Filings subscription required
Q3 2014 13F Filings subscription required
Q2 2014 13F Filings subscription required
Q1 2014 13F Filings subscription required



                      Refresh
                    
 Advanced Export
Download CSV
Download Excel (.xlsx)
Download TSV







                               Click to See Additional Filters
                              



Security Types:




                  Shares


                  Calls


                  Puts


                  Principal

Changes in Holdings:

 New Position
Added to Position
Reduced Position
Closed Out Position
No Change



Ranking is in the top:



Minimum # of shares:



Stock ticker: 



Is ETF?
YesNo



                                      Refresh
                                    








Edit Columns


*Shares are split adjusted
		






×
Report an error






Your name (optional):


Your email (optional):


Error to report or any other comments(required):













                









Cancel





 Click here to report any possible errors with this listing.





13F Filings Available:



                            2017-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-09-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-06-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2016-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-12-31 - 13F-HR/A
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-09-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-06-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2015-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-12-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-09-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-06-30 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          



                            2014-03-31 - 13F-HR
                          

                            (Subscription required)
                          






×
CSV Export Module



      This will schedule a job to export all requested 13f holdings data for this filer.
      When completed, an email will be sent to the email address you specify
      containing a link to download the .zip file of the CSV file(s) you requested.
    



Output Type


             Output all 13f holdings into a single CSV file
             

              Output all 13f holdings into separate CSV files per quarter
              



Columns to include


Filer Name
Stock Name
Stock Ticker
Quarter Date
Type of Security
Current Shares Held
Current Market Value
Previous Shares Held
Previous Market Value
Current % of Portfolio
Previous % of Portfolio
Current Rank
Previous Rank
Change in Shares
Type of Change
Sector




13F Quarters to include


2017-03-31
2016-12-31
2016-09-30
2016-06-30
2016-03-31
2015-12-31
2015-09-30
2015-06-30




Email Address to send data to








Cancel
Schedule Export







View Last Form Adv Compilation Report on Record

WALTER & KEENAN FINANICAL CONSULTING CO
 
202 S. MICHIGAN ST.
SUITE 910

SOUTH BEND
IN
            
        46601
Country: United States


          Business Phone:
          574-287-5977
Fax:
              574-234-5967


Professional Investment Advisor Data

SEC Registration as :

Large Advisory Firm
      


Form of Organization:
Corporation 


Organized in:
MI


Number of employees:
4


Other Business Activities:



Advisor Fees/Compensation:
Percentage of assets under management,Hourly charges,Fixed fees



        Amount of client funds and securities:
      




            Total Number of Clients:
          




            Amount of client funds and securities by related persons:
          




                Total Number of clients from related persons:
              



Disclosures:




    Data above was derived from SEC filings.
  



Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...




WhaleScore history for WALTER & KEENAN FINANCIAL CONSULTING COMPANY
You must have a subscription to view WhaleScore histories








Elevate your investments
Try it for free

























